Washington statutes.
RCW 33.36.040

Falsification of books—Exhibiting false document—Making false statement of assets or liabilities.

Every person who subscribes to or knowingly makes or causes to be made any false statement or false entry in the books of any association, or knowingly subscribes to or exhibits any false or fictitious security, document, or paper, with intent to deceive any person authorized to examine into the affairs of any association, or knowingly makes or publishes any false statement of the amount of the assets or liabilities of the association, is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1982 c 3 s 63; 1945 c 235 s 90; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-209. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 101; 1919 c 169 ss 12, 18; 1913 c 110 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.